Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.400

Reserve officers—Enrollment—Limitations.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any municipality may make provision by appropriate legislation and payment of fees required by *RCW 41.24.030(1) solely for the purpose of enabling any reserve officer to enroll under the retirement pension provisions of this chapter or fees required under *RCW 41.24.030(1) to pay for the costs of extending the relief provisions of this chapter to its reserve officers.

(2) A reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the retirement provisions of this chapter for service under chapter 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, or 41.40 RCW.

(3) Every municipality shall make provisions for the collection and payment of the fees required under this chapter, and shall continue to make provisions for all reserve officers who come under this chapter as long as they continue to be employed as reserve officers.

(4) Except as provided under RCW 41.24.450, a reserve officer is not eligible to receive a benefit under the relief provisions of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 492 s 7; 1999 c 148 s 31; 1998 c 307 s 4; 1995 c 11 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.24.030 was amended by 2023 c 73 s 6, moving provisions for reserve officers to subsection (2).